Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1202
Job training grant, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-1202 to 81-1210, job training grant means a grant from any nonfederal funding source within the Department of Economic Development awarded by the department.

Laws 1995, LB 326, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB956, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 185.
December 31, 2026